Illinois, session 104th, SB1947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 521B-10, 21B-20, 21B-30, 21B-35, and 21B-105 and by adding 6Sections 21B-32 and 21B-47 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/21B-10)8    Sec. 21B-10. State Educator Preparation and Licensure 9Board.10    (a) The State Teacher Certification Board, which had been 11established under Section 21-13 of the School Code prior to 12this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, shall be 13renamed the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 14References in law to the State Teacher Certification Board 15shall mean the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 16The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board shall 17consist of the State Superintendent of Education or a 18representative appointed by him or her, who shall be 19ex-officio chairperson, 5 administrative or faculty members of 20public or private colleges or universities located in this 21State, 3 administrative or faculty members of public community 22colleges located in this State, 3 administrators and 10 23classroom teachers employed in the public schools (5 of whom   SB1947 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1must be members of and nominated by a statewide professional 2teachers' organization and 5 of whom must be members of and 3nominated by a different statewide professional teachers' 4organization), and one regional superintendent of schools, all 5of whom shall be appointed by the State Board of Education; 6provided that at least one of the administrators and at least 3 7of the classroom teachers so appointed must be employees of a 8school district that is subject to the provisions of Article 934 of this Code. A statewide professional teachers' 10organization and a different statewide professional teachers' 11organization shall submit to the State Board of Education for 12consideration at least 3 names of accomplished teachers for 13every one vacancy or expiring term in a classroom teacher 14position. The nominations submitted to the State Board of 15Education under this Section to fill a vacancy or an expiring 16term shall be advisory. Nomination for State Educator 17Preparation and Licensure Board members must be submitted to 18the State Board of Education within 30 days after the vacancy 19or vacancies occur. Nominations to fill an expiring term must 20be submitted to the State Superintendent of Education State 21Board of Education at least 30 days before the expiration of 22that term. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 23Section, if a sufficient number of nominations are not 24received by the State Superintendent of Education State Board 25of Education for a vacancy or expiring term within the 30-day 26period, then the State Superintendent of Education State Board   SB1947 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1of Education may appoint any qualified person, in the same 2manner as the original appointment, to fill the vacancy or 3expiring term. The regular term of each member is 3 years, and 4an individual may be appointed for no more than 2 consecutive 5terms. The term of an appointed member of the State Educator 6Preparation and Licensure Board shall expire on June 30 of his 7or her final year.8    The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board may 9allow one member representing the Board of Higher Education 10and one member representing the Illinois Community College 11Board to serve as nonvoting, ex officio members on the Board. 12    (b) The State Board of Education shall appoint a secretary 13of the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.14    (c) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 15shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly and such other 16special meetings as may be necessary.17    (d) The necessary expenses of the State Educator 18Preparation and Licensure Board shall be provided through the 19State Board of Education. The State Board of Education, in 20consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 21Board, may adopt such rules as may be necessary for the 22administration of this Article.23    (e) (Blank).24(Source: P.A. 100-596, eff. 7-1-18.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)  SB1947 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 2Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 3whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 4required to be licensed must have one of the following 5licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 6educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 7teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 8substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 9individuals certified or certificated or required to be 10certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 11also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 12under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 1330 following one full year of the license being issued.14    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 15State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 16rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 17licenses and endorsements under this Section. 18        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 19    have successfully completed an approved educator 20    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 21    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 22    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 23    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) have 24    successfully completed coursework on the psychology of, 25    the identification of, and the methods of instruction for 26    the exceptional child, including, without limitation,   SB1947 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 2    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 3    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 4    criteria established by rule of the State Board of 5    Education shall be issued a Professional Educator License. 6    Persons seeking a Professional Educator License with a 7    School support personnel endorsement or chief school 8    business official endorsement are exempt from the 9    requirements in items (iii) and (iv). All Professional 10    Educator Licenses are valid until June 30 immediately 11    following 5 years of the license being issued. The 12    Professional Educator License shall be endorsed with 13    specific areas and grade levels in which the individual is 14    eligible to practice. For an early childhood education 15    endorsement, an individual may satisfy the student 16    teaching requirement of his or her early childhood teacher 17    preparation program through placement in a setting with 18    children from birth through grade 2, and the individual 19    may be paid and receive credit while student teaching. The 20    student teaching experience must meet the requirements of 21    and be approved by the individual's early childhood 22    teacher preparation program.23        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 24    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements 25    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 26    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable   SB1947 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.2        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 3    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 4    that limits the license holder to one particular position 5    or does not require completion of an approved educator 6    program or both.7        An individual with an Educator License with 8    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 9    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 10    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.11        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 12    with the following endorsements:13            (A) (Blank). 14            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An 15        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 16        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 17        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 18        endorsement, has done all of the following:19                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 20            college or university with a minimum of a 21            bachelor's degree.22                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 23            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 24            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this 25            Code.26                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required   SB1947 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.2        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 3    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 4    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 5    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 6            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An 7        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 8        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 9        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 10        superintendent in a school district's central office. 11        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 12        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 13        done all of the following:14                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 15            college or university with a minimum of a master's 16            degree in a management field other than education.17                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 18            years in a management level position in a field 19            other than education.20                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 21            of an alternative route to superintendent 22            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 23            of this Code.24                (iv) Passed a content area test required under 25            Section 21B-30 of this Code.26            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in   SB1947 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        order to complete one full year of serving as a 2        superintendent or assistant superintendent.3            (D) (Blank).4            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 5        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 6        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 7        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 8        regionally accredited institution of higher education 9        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 10        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 11        education in each area to be taught.12            The career and technical educator endorsement on 13        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 14        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 15        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.16            An individual who holds a valid career and 17        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 18        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 19        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 20        education classrooms. 21            An individual who holds a valid career and 22        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 23        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 24        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 25        Educator License. 26            (F) (Blank).  SB1947 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 2        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 3        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 4        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 5        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 6        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 7        all of the following requirements:8                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 9            writing ability in the language other than English 10            in which transitional bilingual education is 11            offered.12                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 13            communicate in English.14                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years 15            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 16            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 17            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 18            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 19            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 20            a foreign country that the State Educator 21            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 22            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 23            regionally accredited institution of higher 24            learning in the United States.25            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 26        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12,   SB1947 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 2        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 3        renewed.4            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 5        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 6        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be 7        replaced for any reason. 8            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 9        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 10        other than English in the public schools, an 11        individual who holds an Educator License with 12        Stipulations may also apply for a language 13        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 14        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the 15        following requirements:16                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 17            endorsement. 18                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 19            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 20            by passing the applicable language content test 21            required by the State Board of Education.22                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 23            a regionally accredited institution of higher 24            education or, for individuals educated in a 25            country other than the United States, holds a 26            degree from an institution of higher learning in a   SB1947 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1            foreign country that the State Educator 2            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 3            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 4            regionally accredited institution of higher 5            learning in the United States.6                (iv) (Blank).7            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 8        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 9        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 10        individual's transitional bilingual educator 11        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 12        and shall not be renewed.13            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 14        international educator endorsement on an Educator 15        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 16        individual who is being recruited by a particular 17        school district that conducts formal recruitment 18        programs outside of the United States to secure the 19        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 20        the following requirements:21                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a 22            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.23                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 24            grade level for which he or she will be employed.25                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 26            subject to be taught.  SB1947 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 2            language.3            A holder of a visiting international educator 4        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 5        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 6        programs in the language that was the medium of 7        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 8        provided that he or she passes the English Language 9        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 10        skills in English identified by the State Board of 11        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 12        Preparation and Licensure Board.13            A visiting international educator endorsement on 14        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5 15        years and shall not be renewed.16            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 17        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 18        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 19        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 20        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 21        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited 22        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 23        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 24        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years 25        of age and will be using the Educator License with 26        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten   SB1947 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 2        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 3        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 4        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 5        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 6        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and 7        may be renewed through application and payment of the 8        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 9        this Code. An individual who holds only a 10        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 11        to additional requirements in order to renew the 12        endorsement.13            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 14        business official endorsement on an Educator License 15        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 16        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 17        years of full-time administrative experience in school 18        business management or 2 years of university-approved 19        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 20        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 21        State Board of Education for the preparation of school 22        business administrators and by passage of the 23        applicable State tests, including an applicable 24        content area test. 25            The chief school business official endorsement may 26        also be affixed to the Educator License with   SB1947 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 2        master's degree in business administration, finance, 3        accounting, or public administration and who completes 4        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 5        business management from a regionally accredited 6        institution of higher education and passes the 7        applicable State tests, including an applicable 8        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 9        for any individual employed as a chief school business 10        official. 11            The chief school business official endorsement on 12        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 13        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 14        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 15        license holder completes renewal requirements as 16        required for individuals who hold a Professional 17        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 18        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 19        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 20        Education. 21            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 22        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.23            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 24        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 25        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 26        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation   SB1947 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 2        and who has not successfully completed an 3        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 4        who meets all of the following requirements: 5                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.6                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 7            preparation program at an Illinois institution.8                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 9            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.10                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 11            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 12            minimum score on that assessment, as established 13            by the State Board of Education in consultation 14            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 15            Board.16            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 17        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 18        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 19        be renewed.20            (M) (Blank).21            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services 22        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 23        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 24            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A 25        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 26        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued   SB1947 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 2        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 3        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 4        board and regional office of education shall provide 5        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 6        of Education at the time the application is submitted 7        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional 8        Educator License or an Educator License with 9        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 10        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 11        circumstances require such issuance.12            A provisional career and technical educator 13        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 14        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 15        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.16            An individual who holds a provisional career and 17        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 18        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in 19        career and technical education classrooms. 20            An individual who holds a provisional career and 21        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 22        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 23        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 24        Educator License. 25        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 26    License may be issued to qualified applicants for   SB1947 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 2    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 3    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 4    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 5    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 6    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 7    educator preparation program in this State and have earned 8    at least 90 credit hours.9        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.10        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 11    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 12    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 13    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 14    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 15    Substitute Teaching License.16        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 17    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 18    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under 19    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 20    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer 21    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 22    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 23    office of education within 5 business days after the 24    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant 25    position. A district may continue to employ that same 26    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90   SB1947 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 2    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 3    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 4    written request with the appropriate regional office of 5    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 6    that the position remains vacant and the district 7    continues to actively seek qualified candidates and 8    provides documentation that it has provided training 9    specific to the position, including training on meeting 10    the needs of students with disabilities and English 11    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 12    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 13    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 14    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 15    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 16    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 17    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 18    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in 19    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 20    vacant position.21        There is no limit on the number of days that a 22    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 23    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 24    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year 25    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 26    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the   SB1947 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 2    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 3    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 4    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 5    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 6    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 7    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of 8    this Code.9        A school district may not require an individual who 10    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 11    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 12    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. 13        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 14    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may 15    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 16    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 17    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 18    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the 19    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 20    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 21    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 22    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 23    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 24    accredited institution of higher education.25        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 26    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an   SB1947 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 2    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 3    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 4    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.5        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 6    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 7        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 8    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 9    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 10    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 11    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 12    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 13    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 14    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 15    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 16    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 17    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 18    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public 19    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 20    Section are valid for 5 years. 21(Source: P.A. 102-711, eff. 1-1-23; 102-712, eff. 4-27-22; 22102-713, eff. 1-1-23; 102-717, eff. 4-29-22; 102-894, eff. 235-20-22; 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 24103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff. 257-1-24.)   SB1947 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)2    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.3    (a) (Blank).4    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 5State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 6and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 7required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 8examinations and indicators must be based on national and 9State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 10State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 11Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. By July 1, 2027, the 12State Superintendent of Education shall begin incorporating 13the following topics into revised examinations for individuals 14seeking a Professional Educator License endorsed in teaching 15or administration, excluding a chief school business official 16endorsement: (i) methods of instruction of the exceptional 17child; (ii) methods of reading and reading in the content 18area; and (iii) instructional strategies for English learners. 19The State Board of Education may adopt such rules as may be 20necessary to implement and administer this Section.21    (c) (Blank).22    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 23paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 24applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a 25paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the 26endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other   SB1947 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 221B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 3    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 4required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 5of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 6shall be no exception to this requirement except for an 7applicant seeking a school support personnel endorsement who 8holds an active and valid professional license issued by the 9Department of Financial and Professional Regulation in the 10same subject matter as the endorsement sought, as specified by 11rule by the State Board, or as provided under subparagraph (P) 12of paragraph (1) of Section 21B-20.13    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 14vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 15of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 16of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 17elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 18a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 19bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 20foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 21higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 22language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 23Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 24the language and literacy portion of the test on the 25recommended cut-score determined in the formal 26standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a   SB1947 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 2State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 3candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 4the number who pass the language and literacy portion.5    (e) (Blank).6    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 7Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2026 2025, no candidate 8completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 9candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 10to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 11provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 12August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 13beginning again on September 1, 2029 2025, all candidates 14completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 15candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 16to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 17Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 18Preparation and Licensure Board. Any candidate who has 19successfully completed student teaching or has met one of the 20student teaching exceptions set forth in rules prior to 21September 1, 2028 is exempt from this requirement. A candidate 22may not be required to submit test materials by video 23submission. Subject to appropriation, an individual who holds 24a Professional Educator License and is employed for a minimum 25of one school year by a school district designated as Tier 1 26under Section 18-8.15 may, after application to the State   SB1947 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1Board, receive from the State Board a refund for any costs 2associated with completing the teacher performance assessment 3under this subsection.4    Beginning on September 1, 2026 through August 31, 2029, 5all institutions of higher education offering educator 6preparation programs in this State shall participate in the 7pilot program set forth in Section 21B-32 for the teacher 8performance assessment developed by the State Board of 9Education. 10    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 11administration of this subsection. 12    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 13created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 14teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 15across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 16the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 17supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 18Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 19ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 20shall consist of all of the following members:21        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 22    President of the Senate.23        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 24    Minority Leader of the Senate.25        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 26    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.  SB1947 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 2    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 3    Representatives.4        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 5    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 6    Superintendent of Education.7        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 8    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 9    State Superintendent of Education.10        (7) One member from a statewide organization 11    representing school principals, appointed by the State 12    Superintendent of Education.13        (8) One member from a statewide organization 14    representing regional superintendents of schools, 15    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.16        (9) One member from a statewide organization 17    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 18    Superintendent of Education.19        (10) One member representing a school district 20    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 21    State Superintendent of Education.22        (11) One member of an association representing rural 23    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 24    of Education.25        (12) One member representing a suburban school 26    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of   SB1947 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    Education.2        (13) One member from a statewide organization 3    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 4    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 5    of Education.6        (14) One member from a statewide organization 7    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 8    State Superintendent of Education.9        (15) One member from a statewide organization 10    representing school districts in the collar counties of 11    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 12    of Education.13        (16) Three members, each representing a different 14    public university in this State and each a current member 15    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 16    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 17    Education.18        (17) Three members, each representing a different 19    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 20    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 21    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 22    Superintendent of Education.23        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 24    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.25        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 26    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students   SB1947 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 2    Education.3        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 4    focused on research-based education policy to support a 5    school system that prepares all students for college, a 6    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 7    Superintendent of Education.8        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 9    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 10    Superintendent of Education.11        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 12    that partners with educator preparation programs and 13    school districts to support the growth and development of 14    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 15    of Education. 16        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 17    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 18    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 19    Education.20        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 21    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 22    Superintendent of Education.23        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 24    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 25    Superintendent of Education. 26    Members of the Task Force shall serve without   SB1947 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 2the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 3meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 4who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 5Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 6administrative and other support to the Task Force.7    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 8on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 9performance assessment system in this State, to the State 10Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 11dissolved upon submission of this report. 12    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 13performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 14time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 15consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 16Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 17organization or tests designed by the State Board of 18Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 19and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 20assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 21tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 22person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 23of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 24the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 25score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 26Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator   SB1947 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 2Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 3may include scoring and retaking of each test section 4separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 5not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 6designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 7with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 8    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 9the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 10applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 11subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 12Code in the English language and in the language of the 13transitional bilingual education program requested by the 14applicant. 15    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 16provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 17district subject to Article 34 of this Code.18    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 19testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 20limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 21validation, and determination of a passing score, 22administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 23applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 24years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 25accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 26such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to   SB1947 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.2(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 3103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 48-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/21B-32 new)6    Sec. 21B-32. Teacher Performance Assessment Advisory 7Committee. 8    (a) The State Superintendent of Education shall establish 9a Teacher Performance Assessment Advisory Committee of no more 10than 15 members to aid in operationalizing and creating a 11pilot, State-developed, teacher performance assessment (TPA). 12The Committee shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:13        (1) Create materials and resources that are necessary 14    for the implementation of a TPA.15        (2) Identify sources of evidence required for the 16    evaluation of a TPA.17        (3) Monitor a multiyear pilot program to create a 18    State-developed TPA and make recommendations informed by 19    collected data of modifications to the TPA.20        (4) Support the State Board of Education in developing 21    rubrics and the resources necessary for the completion and 22    evaluation of the valid and reliable assessment, creating 23    the required training for evaluators of the assessment, 24    implementing the multiyear pilot program, including, but 25    not limited to, establishing criteria and sufficient   SB1947 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    evidence for successful completion of the TPA, and 2    recommending refinements to the assessment as needed.3    (b) The membership of the Committee shall include 4individuals with expertise in assessment development, 5including statisticians and psychometricians, and individuals 6with expertise in the elements of effective teaching, 7including current Illinois educators. The membership of the 8Committee shall represent the ethnic, racial, and geographic 9diversity of this State and include expertise across early 10childhood, elementary, middle, and high school settings, as 11well as expertise in the instruction of English learners and 12students with disabilities.13    (c) The State Board of Education shall provide 14administrative support to the Committee.15    (d) Members of the Committee shall serve without 16compensation, but may be reimbursed for reasonable and 17necessary expenses, including travel, from funds appropriated 18to the State Board of Education for that purpose, subject to 19the rules of the appropriate travel control board.20    (e) The first meeting of the Committee shall be at the call 21of the State Superintendent, and each subsequent meeting shall 22be at the call of the chairperson, who shall be designated by 23the State Superintendent. The Committee shall hold regular 24meetings at least quarterly and such other meetings as 25determined by its chairperson.26    (f) Data from completed pilot TPAs from institutions of   SB1947 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1higher education with approved educator preparation programs 2shall be shared with the Committee, which shall, as 3applicable, provide an annual recommendation on the use of the 4TPA to the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board and 5the State Board of Education.6    (g) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 7Committee, may adopt such rules as may be necessary for the 8administration of this Section.9    (h) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028. 10    (105 ILCS 5/21B-35)11    Sec. 21B-35. Minimum requirements for educators trained in 12other states or countries.13    (a) Any applicant who has not been entitled by an 14Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 15institution of higher education applying for a Professional 16Educator License endorsed in a teaching field or school 17support personnel area must meet the following requirements:18        (1) the applicant must:19            (A) hold a comparable and valid educator license 20        or certificate, as defined by rule, with similar grade 21        level and content area credentials from another state, 22        with the State Board of Education having the authority 23        to determine what constitutes similar grade level and 24        content area credentials from another state;25            (B) have a bachelor's degree from a regionally   SB1947 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        accredited institution of higher education; and2            (C) (blank); and or 3            (D) have successfully passed all State 4        examinations required by Section 21B-30; or5        (2) the applicant must:6            (A) have completed a state-approved program for 7        the licensure area sought. Until July 1, 2027 or the 8        date that the revised test for a particular content 9        area is implemented, whichever is later, the program 10        must include , including coursework concerning (i) 11        methods of instruction of the exceptional child, (ii) 12        methods of reading that align with all applicable 13        standards set forth in Part 23 of Title 23 of the 14        Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 15        content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 16        English learners;17            (B) have a bachelor's degree from a regionally 18        accredited institution of higher education;19            (C) have successfully met all Illinois examination 20        requirements, except that:21                (i) (blank);22                (ii) an applicant who has successfully 23            completed a test of content, as defined by rules, 24            at the time of initial licensure in another state 25            is not required to complete a test of content; and26                (iii) an applicant for a teaching endorsement   SB1947 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1            who has successfully completed an evidence-based 2            assessment of teacher effectiveness, as defined by 3            rules, at the time of initial licensure in another 4            state is not required to complete an 5            evidence-based assessment of teacher 6            effectiveness; and7            (D) for an applicant for a teaching endorsement, 8        have completed student teaching or an equivalent 9        experience or, for an applicant for a school service 10        personnel endorsement, have completed an internship or 11        an equivalent experience.12    (b) In order to receive a Professional Educator License 13endorsed in a teaching field or school support personnel area, 14applicants trained in another country must meet all of the 15following requirements:16        (1) Have completed a comparable education program in 17    another country.18        (2) Have had transcripts evaluated by an evaluation 19    service approved by the State Superintendent of Education.20        (3) Have a degree comparable to a degree from a 21    regionally accredited institution of higher education.22        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 23    test for a particular content area is implemented, 24    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 25    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 26    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with   SB1947 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 2    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 3    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 4    English learners. Applicants seeking a school support 5    personnel endorsement are exempt from this paragraph (4). 6        (5) (Blank).7        (6) (Blank).8        (7) Have successfully met all State licensure 9    examination requirements. Applicants who have successfully 10    completed a test of content, as defined by rules, at the 11    time of initial licensure in another country shall not be 12    required to complete a test of content. Applicants for a 13    teaching endorsement who have successfully completed an 14    evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness, as 15    defined by rules, at the time of initial licensure in 16    another country shall not be required to complete an 17    evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness. 18        (8) Have completed student teaching or an equivalent 19    experience.20        (9) (Blank). 21    (b-5) All applicants who have not been entitled by an 22Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 23institution of higher education and applicants trained in 24another country applying for a Professional Educator License 25endorsed for principal or superintendent must hold a master's 26degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher   SB1947 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1education and hold a comparable and valid educator license or 2certificate with similar grade level and subject matter 3credentials, with the State Board of Education having the 4authority to determine what constitutes similar grade level 5and subject matter credentials from another state, or must 6meet all of the following requirements:7        (1) Have completed an educator preparation program 8    approved by another state or comparable educator program 9    in another country leading to the receipt of a license or 10    certificate for the Illinois endorsement sought.11        (2) Have successfully met all State licensure 12    examination requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of 13    this Code. Applicants who have successfully completed a 14    test of content, as defined by rules, at the time of 15    initial licensure in another state or country shall not be 16    required to complete a test of content. 17        (2.5) Have completed an internship, as defined by 18    rule. 19        (3) (Blank).20        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 21    test for a particular content area is implemented, 22    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 23    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 24    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with 25    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 26    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the   SB1947 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 2    English learners.3        (4.5) (Blank). 4        (5) Have completed a master's degree.5        (6) Have successfully completed teaching, school 6    support, or administrative experience as defined by rule. 7    (b-7) All applicants who have not been entitled by an 8Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 9institution of higher education applying for a Professional 10Educator License endorsed for Director of Special Education 11must hold a master's degree from a regionally accredited 12institution of higher education and must hold a comparable and 13valid educator license or certificate with similar grade level 14and subject matter credentials, with the State Board of 15Education having the authority to determine what constitutes 16similar grade level and subject matter credentials from 17another state, or must meet all of the following requirements:18        (1) Have completed a master's degree.19        (2) Have 2 years of full-time experience providing 20    special education services.21        (3) Have successfully completed all examination 22    requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code. 23    Applicants who have successfully completed a test of 24    content, as identified by rules, at the time of initial 25    licensure in another state or country shall not be 26    required to complete a test of content.   SB1947 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 2    test for a particular content area is implemented, 3    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 4    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 5    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with 6    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 7    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 8    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 9    English learners.10    (b-10) All applicants who have not been entitled by an 11Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 12institution of higher education applying for a Professional 13Educator License endorsed for chief school business official 14must hold a master's degree from a regionally accredited 15institution of higher education and must hold a comparable and 16valid educator license or certificate with similar grade level 17and subject matter credentials, with the State Board of 18Education having the authority to determine what constitutes 19similar grade level and subject matter credentials from 20another state, or must meet all of the following requirements:21        (1) Have completed a master's degree in school 22    business management, finance, or accounting.23        (2) Have successfully completed an internship in 24    school business management or have 2 years of experience 25    as a school business administrator.26        (3) Have successfully met all State examination   SB1947 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code. 2    Applicants who have successfully completed a test of 3    content, as identified by rules, at the time of initial 4    licensure in another state or country shall not be 5    required to complete a test of content. 6        (4) (Blank). Have completed modules aligned to 7    standards concerning methods of instruction of the 8    exceptional child, methods of reading and reading in the 9    content area, and instructional strategies for English 10    learners.11    (c) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 12State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 13rules as may be necessary to implement this Section.14(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23.) 15    (105 ILCS 5/21B-47 new)16    Sec. 21B-47. Paraprofessional to Teacher Pathway Program. 17    (a) There is established the Paraprofessional Teacher 18Pathway Program. The Paraprofessional Teacher Pathway Program 19may be offered by a recognized institution approved to offer 20educator preparation programs by the State Board of Education, 21in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 22Licensure Board. The Program shall provide an expedited 23pathway for paraprofessionals to earn a Professional Educator 24License in a specific content area, including, but not limited 25to, elementary education or special education. The Program   SB1947 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1shall create a partnership with the institution and other 2entities, as defined by rule by the State Board of Education.3    (b) The Program shall meet all of the following criteria: 4        (1) The Program shall include a program of study with 5    coursework in instructional planning, instructional 6    strategies, including special education, reading, and 7    English language learning, classroom management, and the 8    assessment of students and use of data to drive 9    instruction. 10        (2) The Program shall meet the criteria of 23 Ill. 11    Adm. Code 25.25(a)(2)(A) relative to required coursework. 12        (3) The Program shall include student teaching or an 13    equivalent experience. 14    (c) An individual shall meet all of the following 15requirements for entry into the Program: 16        (1) The individual holds a valid Educator License with 17    Stipulations with a paraprofessional educator endorsement 18    or a valid paraprofessional approval. 19        (2) The individual is employed as a paraprofessional 20    providing service to one or more students within the 21    licensure content area sought, such as elementary 22    education or special education. 23        (3) The individual has worked at least 2 years as a 24    paraprofessional. 25        (4) The individual has completed at least 60 semester 26    hours of coursework from a regionally accredited   SB1947 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1    institution of higher education.2    (d) The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 3necessary to implement this Section, including, but not 4limited to, program proposal requirements. 5    (105 ILCS 5/21B-105)6    Sec. 21B-105. Granting of recognition; regional 7accreditation; definitions.8    (a) "Recognized", as used in this Article in connection 9with the word "school" or "institution", means such college, 10university, or for-profit or not-for-profit entity that meets 11requirements set by the State Board of Education, in 12consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 13Board. Application for recognition of the school or 14institution as an educator preparation institution must be 15made to the State Board of Education. The State Board of 16Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 17and Licensure Board, shall set the criteria by which the 18school or institution is to be judged and, through the 19secretary of the State Board, arrange for an official 20inspection and shall grant recognition of such school or 21institution as may meet the required standards. If the 22standards include requirements with regard to education in 23acquiring skills in working with culturally distinctive 24students, as defined by the State Board of Education, then the 25rules of the State Board of Education shall include the   SB1947 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1criteria used to evaluate compliance with this requirement. No 2school or institution may make assignments of student teachers 3or teachers for practice teaching so as to promote segregation 4on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, or national 5origin.6    Any for-profit or not-for-profit entity must also be 7approved by the Board of Higher Education. 8    All recommendations or entitlements for educator licensure 9shall be made by a recognized institution operating a program 10of preparation for the license that is approved by the State 11Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 12Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of Education, 13in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 14Licensure Board, shall have the power to define a major or 15minor when used as a basis for recognition and licensure 16purposes.17    (b) "Regionally accredited", or "accredited", as used in 18this Article in connection with a university or institution, 19means an institution of higher education accredited by the 20North Central Association or other comparable regional 21accrediting association.22    (c) An institution of higher education approved to offer 23educator preparation programs in this State may, upon the 24request of a public community college in this State, enter 25into a partnership agreement with the community college to 26offer an approved educator preparation program leading to   SB1947 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 10291 LNS 20365 b1educator licensure for individuals who already hold a 2bachelor's degree. The partnership must be approved by the 3State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 4Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.5    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 6requirements of a partnership agreement under this subsection. 7(Source: P.A. 100-596, eff. 7-1-18.)